Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.150

Introducing contraband in the second degree.

(1) A person is guilty of introducing contraband in the second degree if he or she knowingly and unlawfully provides contraband to any person confined in a detention facility or secure facility under chapter 71.09 RCW with the intent that such contraband be of assistance in an escape or in the commission of a crime.

(2) Introducing contraband in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2013 c 43 s 4; 2011 c 336 s 405; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.150.]